Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 1357, designated Code Sections 37-2-1 through 37-2-12 as Article 1 of this chapter.

37-2-1.
Declaration of purpose.

The State of Georgia recognizes its responsibility for its citizens who are mentally ill or developmentally disabled including individuals with epilepsy, cerebral palsy, autism, and other neurologically disabling conditions or who abuse alcohol, narcotics,
or other drugs and recognizes an obligation to such citizens to meet their needs through a coordinated system of community facilities, programs, and services.

It is the policy of this state to provide adequate mental health, developmental disability, addictive disease, and other disability services to all its citizens. It is further the policy of this state to provide such services through a unified system
which encourages cooperation and sharing of resources among all providers of such services, both governmental and private.

It is the purpose of this chapter to enable and encourage the development of comprehensive, preventive, early detection, habilitative, rehabilitative, and treatment disability services; to improve and expand community programs for the disabled; to provide
continuity of care through integration of county, area, regional, and state services and facilities for the disabled; to provide for joint disability services and the sharing of manpower and other resources; and to monitor and
restructure the system of providing disability services in the State of Georgia to make better use of the combined public and private resources of the state and local communities.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to achieve the objectives set forth in this Code section.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-601, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 17; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

Cross references.

Special education services for children who are physically, mentally, or emotionally disabled, §

20-2-152

.

State health planning and development generally, T. 31, C. 6.

Coverage for autism, §

33-24-59.10

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “the” was deleted following “encourage the” near the beginning of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Community service board” means a public mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases board established pursuant to Code Section 37-2-6.

“Community service board area” means an area inclusive of the counties which fall within the boundaries of a community service board as designated by the department pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 37-2-3 for the establishment of a community
service board.

“Community service board service area” means a community service board area and any other county or portion thereof in which the community service board provides services.

“Council” means the Behavioral Health Coordinating Council established pursuant to Code Section 37-2-4.

“Governing board” means the governing board of a community service board established pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 37-2-6.

“Health services” means any education or service provided by the department, the Department of Public Health, or the Department of Human Services, either directly or by contract.

“Hospital” means a state owned or state operated facility providing services which include, but are not limited to, inpatient care and the diagnosis, care, and treatment or habilitation of the disabled. Such hospital may also provide or manage state owned
or operated programs in the community.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-602, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 17; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, §§ 1-7, 2-2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 3/HB 1223; Ga. L. 2009,
p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2014, p. 309, § 2/SB 349.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 10/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect or abate any right accrued or vested prior to July 1, 2006, or any action or proceeding commenced prior to July 1,
2006, under any law amended or repealed by this Act.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 11/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that those provisions of that Act which authorize community service boards to amend their bylaws and authorize county governing authorities to appoint no sooner than May
1, 2006, any community service board members to take office on July 1, 2006, shall become effective April 21, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

37-2-2.1.
[Repealed] Creation of Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Addictive Diseases.

History.
Repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

37-2-2.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7.

37-2-3.
Designation of boundaries for mental health, development disabilities, and addictive diseases regions; community service board areas.

The board shall designate boundaries for mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases regions and may modify the boundaries of such regions from time to time as deemed necessary by the board.

The department, with the approval of the commissioner, shall designate community service board areas, which shall serve as boundaries for the establishment of community service boards within this state for the purpose of delivering disability services.
The department shall be authorized to initiate the redesignation of such community service board area boundaries and may consider requests from a county or group of counties or a community service board or a group of community
service boards for recommended changes to the boundaries of the community service board areas. The department, with the approval of the commissioner, is authorized to redesignate two or more community service board areas as a single
community service board area. Two or more community service boards may request that the department, with the approval of the commissioner, merge the community service board areas served by such boards into a single community service
board area. If the department, with the approval of the commissioner, authorizes the redesignation or merging of community services board areas pursuant to this paragraph, the assets, equipment, and resources of such community
service boards shall become the assets, equipment, and resources of the reconstituted community service board serving the successor single board area. It is the intent of the General Assembly not to limit a community service board
to serving only those counties within the boundaries of its community service board area.

To the extent practicable, the boundaries for regional planning boards and offices and community service areas shall not subdivide any county unit. In dividing the state into areas, the board and the department shall take into consideration such factors
as geographic boundaries, roads and other means of transportation, population concentrations, city and county lines, other relevant community services, and community economic and social relationships. Consideration shall also be
given to the existence of facilities and personnel available in the areas for the delivery of disability services.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-604, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 4/HB 1223; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011,
p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2014, p. 309, § 3/SB 349.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 10/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect or abate any right accrued or vested prior to July 1, 2006, or any action or proceeding commenced prior to July 1,
2006, under any law amended or repealed by this Act.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 11/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that those provisions of that Act which authorize community service boards to amend their bylaws and authorize county governing authorities to appoint no sooner than May
1, 2006, any community service board members to take office on July 1, 2006, shall become effective April 21, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

37-2-4.
Behavioral Health Coordinating Council; membership; meetings; obligations.

There is created the Behavioral Health Coordinating Council. The council shall consist of the commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities; the commissioner of early care and learning; the commissioner of community health; the commissioner
of public health; the commissioner of human services; the commissioner of juvenile justice; the commissioner of corrections; the commissioner of community supervision; the commissioner of community affairs; the commissioner of
the Technical College System of Georgia; the Commissioner of Labor; the State School Superintendent; the chairperson of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles; a behavioral health expert employed by the University System of Georgia,
designated by the chancellor of the university system; two members, appointed by the Governor; the ombudsman appointed pursuant to Code Section 37-2-32; the Child Advocate for the Protection of Children; an expert on early childhood
mental health, appointed by the Governor; an expert on child and adolescent health, appointed by the Governor; a pediatrician, appointed by the Governor; an adult consumer of public behavioral health services, appointed by the
Governor; a family member of a consumer of public behavioral health services, appointed by the Governor; a parent of a child receiving public behavioral health services, appointed by the Governor; a member of the House of Representatives,
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and a member of the Senate, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor.

The commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities shall be the chairperson of the council. A vice chairperson and a secretary shall be selected by the members of the council from among its members as prescribed in the council’s bylaws.

Meetings of the council shall be held quarterly, or more frequently, on the call of the chairperson. Meetings of the council shall be held with no less than five days’ public notice for regular meetings and with such notice as the bylaws may prescribe
for special meetings. Each member shall be given written or electronic notice of all meetings. All meetings of the council shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 14 of Title 50. Minutes or transcripts shall be kept of all
meetings of the council and shall include a record of the votes of each member, specifying the yea or nay vote or absence of each member, on all questions and matters coming before the council, and minutes or transcripts of each
meeting shall be posted on the state agency website of each council member designee. No member may abstain from a vote other than for reasons constituting disqualification to the satisfaction of a majority of a quorum of the council
on a recorded vote. No member of the council shall be represented by a delegate or agent. Any member who misses three duly posted meetings of the council over the course of a calendar year shall be replaced by an appointee of the
Governor unless the council chairperson officially excuses each such absence.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, a majority of the members of the council then in office shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. No vacancy on the council shall impair the right of the quorum to exercise the powers
and perform the duties of the council. The vote of a majority of the members of the council present at the time of the vote, if a quorum is present at such time, shall be the act of the council unless the vote of a greater number
is required by law or by the bylaws of the council.

The council shall:

Develop solutions to the systemic barriers or problems to the delivery of behavioral health services by making recommendations in writing and publicly available that implement funding, policy changes, practice changes, and evaluation of specific goals
designed to improve delivery of behavioral health services, increase access to behavioral health services, and improve outcome for individuals, including children, adolescents, and adults, served by the various departments;

Focus on specific goals designed to resolve issues for provision of behavioral health services that negatively impact individuals, including children, adolescents, and adults, serviced by the various departments;

Monitor and evaluate the implementation of established goals and recommendations; and

Establish common outcome measures that are to be utilized for and represented in the annual report to the council.

The council shall consult with various entities, including state agencies, councils, and advisory committees and other advisory groups as deemed appropriate by the council.

All state departments, agencies, boards, bureaus, commissions, and authorities are authorized and required to make available to the council access to records or data which are available in electronic format or, if electronic format is unavailable, in
whatever format is available. The judicial and legislative branches are authorized to likewise provide such access to the council.

The council shall be attached to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities for administrative purposes only as provided by Code Section 50-4-3.

The council shall submit annual reports no later than October 1 of its recommendations and evaluation of its implementation and any recommendations for funding to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination, the Governor, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and the Lieutenant Governor.

The recommendations developed by the council and the annual reports of the council shall be presented to the board of each member department for approval or review at least annually at a publicly scheduled meeting.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “behavioral health services” has the same meaning as “disability services” as defined in Code Section 37-1-1.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-611, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 286,
§ 6/SB 244; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-21/HB 214; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-58/HB 310; Ga. L. 2015, p. 617, § 1/HB 288; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-17/HB 186; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 4-9/HB 1013.

The 2019 amendment,
effective July 1, 2019, in paragraph (h)(1), inserted “no later than October 1” and substituted “its implementation to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination” for “their implementation to the Governor and the General
Assembly” at the end.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, inserted “the commissioner of early care and learning;”, “the commissioner of the Technical College System of Georgia;”, “a behavioral health expert employed by the University System of Georgia, designated
by the chancellor of the university system;”, and “the Child Advocate for the Protection of Children; an expert on early childhood mental health, appointed by the Governor; an expert on child and adolescent health, appointed by the
Governor; a pediatrician, appointed by the Governor;” in subsection (a); inserted “from among its members” in the second sentence in subsection (b); in subsection (c), inserted “or electronic” in the third sentence, added “, and minutes
or transcripts of each meeting shall be posted on the state agency website of each council member designee” at the end of the fifth sentence, and added the last sentence; in paragraph (e)(1), inserted “in writing and publicly available”
and substituted “delivery of behavioral health services, increase access to behavioral health services, and improve outcome for individuals, including children, adolescents, and adults,” for “services delivery and outcome for individuals”;
substituted “individuals, including children, adolescents, and adults, serviced by the various departments” for “individuals serviced by at least two departments” in paragraph (e)(2), inserted “and recommendations” in paragraph (e)(3),
added “that are to be utilized for and represented in the annual report to the council” at the end of paragraph (e)(4); substituted “shall” for “may” in paragraph (f)(1); inserted “and any recommendations for funding” and “, the Governor,
the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Lieutenant Governor” in paragraph (h)(1), and inserted “and the annual reports of the council” and “at a publicly scheduled meeting” in paragraph (h)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For annual survey of administrative law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2015).

37-2-4.1.
Local mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases offices; regional mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive disease advisory councils.

The department may create local mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases offices. The number of these offices may be modified from time to time as deemed necessary by the department.

The department shall create a separate regional mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases advisory council for each region of the department as established under Code Section 37-2-3. Each regional advisory council may provide recommendations
for the coordinated and comprehensive planning for its region in conformity with minimum standards and procedures established by the department.

The powers, functions, obligations, and duties of the regional mental health, mental retardation, and substance abuse boards as they existed on June 30, 2002, are transferred to the department. The department shall succeed to all rights, privileges, entitlements,
contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions of the regional boards which were in effect on June 30, 2002, and none of those rights, privileges, entitlements, contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions shall
be impaired or diminished by reason of such transfer. In all such instances, the department shall be substituted for such regional board and the department shall succeed to the rights and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements,
and other transactions.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1361, § 2/HB 512.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-2-5.
Regional advisory councils — Establishing policy and direction for disability services; membership; bylaws; meetings; expenses.

Each regional advisory council shall engage in disability services planning within its region and may perform other functions as may be provided or authorized by law, such as:

Informing the department of local needs and priorities;

Organizing natural supports;

Recommending community improvements;

Providing input to the department regarding the local perspective of consumers, families, and community stakeholders; and

Encouraging prevention programs.

Membership on the regional advisory council within an established region shall be determined as follows:

Each county with a population of 50,000 or less according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census shall appoint one member to the council;

Each county with a population of more than 50,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census shall appoint one member for each population increment of 50,000 or any portion thereof;

The appointment or appointments for each county shall be made by the county governing authority; and

The county governing authority shall appoint a consumer of disability services, a family member of a consumer, an advocate for disability services, or a local leader or business person with an interest in mental health, developmental disabilities, and
addictive diseases; provided, however, that for counties with more than one appointment, the county governing authority shall seek to ensure that such appointments represent various groups and disability services.

A member of the community service board which serves that region;

An employee or board member of a private or public entity which contracts with the department, the Department of Human Services, or the Department of Public Health to provide health, mental health, developmental disabilities, or addictive diseases services
within the region;

An employee of such local office or employee or board member of any private or public group, organization, or service provider which contracts with or receives funds from such local office; or

An employee or board member of the department, the Department of Human Services, or the Department of Public Health.

(b.1)
A county governing authority may appoint the school superintendent, a member of the county board of health, a member of the local board of education, or any other elected or appointed official to serve on the regional
advisory council, provided that such person meets the qualifications of paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section, such person does not serve on a community service board, and such appointment does not violate the
provisions of Chapter 10 of Title 45.

(b.2) (1)
A person shall not be eligible to be appointed to or serve on a regional advisory council if such person is:

In making appointments to the regional advisory council, the various county governing authorities shall consider the cultural and social characteristics, including gender, race, ethnic, and age characteristics, of the regional and county populations.
The county governing authorities are further encouraged to ensure that each disability group is viably represented on the regional advisory council, and in so doing the county governing authority may consider suggestions for appointments
from clinical professional associations as well as advocacy groups, including but not limited to the Georgia Mental Health Consumer Network, People First of Georgia, the Georgia Parent Support Network, National Alliance for the
Mentally Ill Georgia, the American Association for Retired Persons, Georgians for Children, Mental Health America of Georgia, Georgia ARC Network, and the Georgia Council on Substance Abuse and their local chapters and affiliates.

The initial term of a new member of a regional advisory council shall be determined by the commissioner in order to establish staggered terms on the council. At such time as the terms of the members of the council are equally staggered, the term of a
member of the regional advisory council shall be for a period of three years and until the member’s successor is appointed and qualified. A member may serve no more than two consecutive terms. The term of a regional advisory council
member shall terminate upon resignation, death, or inability to serve due to medical infirmity or other incapacity or such other reasonable condition as the regional advisory council may impose under its bylaws. Vacancies on the
regional advisory council shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

Prior to August 1, 2015, each regional advisory council shall adopt bylaws governing its operation and management. At a minimum, the bylaws shall provide for staggered terms of the council, requirements for an annual meeting to elect officers, a mechanism
for ensuring that consumers of disability services and family members of consumers constitute a majority of the appointments to the council, and a mechanism for ensuring that each disability service is equitably represented by
appointments to the council. Any council member who serves an initial term of less than three years may be eligible to be reappointed for two full consecutive three-year terms. The chairperson and vice chairperson of the regional
advisory council shall be elected from among the members of the council to serve a term of one year with the option of reelection for an additional one-year term. The bylaws shall provide for any other officers and their means
of selection, as well as any necessary committees or subcommittees of the council. Prior to their adoption by the regional advisory council, the bylaws shall be submitted to the department for review and approval. The regional
advisory council must have the written approval of the commissioner prior to the adoption of bylaws.

The regional advisory council shall meet not less than once every four months, beginning on July 1 and continuing through the next June 30, which time frame shall be the fiscal year for each regional advisory council.

Each member of the regional advisory council may, upon approval of the department, receive reimbursement for actual expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of such office in conformance with rates and allowances set for state employees by the Office
of Planning and Budget and the same mileage allowance for use of a personal car as that received by all other state officials and employees or a travel allowance of actual transportation cost if traveling by public carrier.

Each regional advisory council which is composed of members who are appointed thereto by the governing authority of only one county shall have a minimum of six members, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, which members
shall in all other respects be appointed as provided in this Code section.

(2)
A person shall not be eligible to be appointed to or serve on a regional advisory council if such person’s spouse, parent, child, or sibling is a member of that regional advisory council or a member, employee, or board member
specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection. No person who has served a full term or more on a regional advisory council or regional planning board may be appointed to a community service board until a period of at least two years
has passed since the time such person served on the regional advisory council or the regional planning board. No person who has served on a regional planning board and who becomes a member of a regional advisory council after June
30, 2015, may be appointed to a community service board until a period of at least two years has passed since the time such person has served on the regional planning board or regional advisory council.

History.
Code 1933, §§ 88-605, 88-606, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 440, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453,
§ 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1361, § 3/HB 512.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

37-2-5.1.
Allocation of funds.

State, federal, and other funds appropriated to the department and available for the purpose of funding the planning and delivery of disability services shall be distributed in accordance with this subsection. All funds associated with services to clients
residing within a given region shall be managed through the department; the term “all funds” shall include funding for hospitals, community service boards, private and public contracts, and any contracts relating to service delivery
for clients within the given region. The department shall establish a funding amount for regions conditioned upon the amount of funds appropriated. The funding amount shall be determined, in part, based on consumer service needs,
service and program history, population based funding needs, infrastructure mandates, program efficiency and effectiveness, geographic distances, and other factors affecting the cost and level of service needs within each region.

The department shall establish guidelines to ensure that regions receive such funding based on client population, past and future service delivery needs and capabilities, and in consideration of special needs populations, such as homeless and transient
populations. The department shall ensure that funds are managed based primarily on services to clients and in compliance with all federal, state, and regulatory requirements.

The department, in compliance with the provisions of the General Appropriations Act and other applicable laws, is authorized to move funds to and between community and institutional programs based on need, and the department shall develop appropriate
allocation and accounting mechanisms to move funds in a planned and rational manner between hospitals, community service boards, and other providers based on client needs and utilization.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-5.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1361, § 4/HB 512.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which enacts this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that this Code section is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would
have repealed this Code section.